Utah statutes.
61-2b-21.   Denial of licensure, certification, or registration.

The division may, upon compliance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, deny the issuance of a license, certification, or registration to an applicant on any of the grounds enumerated in this chapter.

